Washington statutes.
RCW 19.116.060

Unlawful subleasing of motor vehicle—Conditions.

A person engages in an act of unlawful subleasing of a motor vehicle if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The motor vehicle is subject to a lease contract or security agreement the terms of which prohibit the transfer or assignment of any right or interest in the motor vehicle or under the lease contract or security agreement; and

(2) The person is not a party to the lease contract or security agreement; and

(3) The person transfers or assigns or purports to transfer or assign any right or interest in the motor vehicle or under the lease contract or security agreement to any person who is not a party to the lease contract or security agreement; and

(4) The person does not obtain, before the transfer or assignment described in subsection (3) of this section, written consent to the transfer or assignment from the motor vehicle lessor in connection with a lease contract or from the secured party in connection with a security agreement; and

(5) The person receives compensation or some other consideration for the transfer or assignment described in subsection (3) of this section.

[ 1990 c 44 s 7.]